Washington statutes.
RCW 43.114.040

Executive director—Duties.

The executive director of the commission shall:

(1) Monitor state legislation affecting LGBTQ people;

(2) Work with state agencies to assess programs and policies that affect LGBTQ people;

(3) Coordinate with the minority commissions, women's commission, and human rights commission to address issues of mutual concern; and

(4) Work as a liaison between the public and private sector to eliminate barriers to economic and health equity for LGBTQ people.

[ 2019 c 395 s 5.]